Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.600

Graduate fellowship trust fund program—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that quality in the state's public four-year institutions of higher education would be strengthened by additional partnerships between citizens and the institutions. The legislature intends to foster these partnerships by creating a matching grant program to assist public four-year institutions of higher education in creating endowments for funding fellowships for distinguished graduate students.

[ 1987 c 147 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.10.880.]